Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-525
Audiology or speech-language pathology assistant; supervisor; duties.

(1) When supervising an audiology or speech-language pathology assistant, the supervising audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall:

(a) Provide supervision for no more than two audiology or speech-language pathology assistants at one time;

(b) Provide direct onsite supervision for the first two treatment sessions of each patient's care;

(c) Provide direct onsite supervision of at least twenty percent of all subsequent treatment sessions per quarter;

(d) Provide at least ten hours of inservice training per registration period, either formal or informal, which is directly related to the particular services provided by the audiology or speech-language pathology assistant; and

(e) Prepare semiannual performance evaluations of the audiology or speech-language pathology assistant to be reviewed with the audiology or speech-language pathology assistant on a one-to-one basis.

(2) The supervising audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall be responsible for all aspects of patient treatment.

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 30;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 76;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,195.08;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 210.